New York, session 2025-2026, A9214.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "victims protection and child sex buyer accountability act". 3 § 2. The first undesignated paragraph of section 230.05 of the penal 4 law, as amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read 5 as follows: 6 A person is guilty of patronizing a person for prostitution in the 7 second degree when, being eighteen years old or more, [he or she] such 8 person patronizes a person for prostitution and the person patronized is 9 less than [fifteen] eighteen years old. 10 § 3. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 230.06 of the penal law, as 11 amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, are amended to read as 12 follows: 13 1. [He or she] Such person patronizes a person for prostitution and 14 the person patronized is less than eleven years old; or 15 2. Being eighteen years old or more, [he or she] such person patron- 16 izes a person for prostitution and the person patronized is less than 17 [thirteen] fifteen years old. 18 § 4. The first undesignated paragraph of section 230.11 of the penal 19 law, as amended by chapter 777 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 20 as follows: 21 A person is guilty of aggravated patronizing a minor for prostitution 22 in the third degree when, being twenty-one years old or more, [he or 23 she] such person patronizes a person for prostitution and the person EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13861-02-6 A. 9214--A 2 1 patronized is less than [seventeen] eighteen years old and the person 2 guilty of patronizing engages in vaginal sexual contact, oral sexual 3 contact, anal sexual contact, or aggravated sexual contact as those 4 terms are defined in section 130.00 of this part, with the person 5 patronized. 6 § 5. Section 230.32 of the penal law, as added by chapter 627 of the 7 laws of 1978, the opening paragraph and subdivisions 1 and 2 as amended 8 by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 230.32 Promoting prostitution in the first degree. 10 A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the first degree when 11 [he or she: 12 1. knowingly advances or profits from prostitution of a person less 13 than thirteen years old; or 14 2. being twenty-one years old or more, he or she] such person knowing- 15 ly advances or profits from prostitution of a person less than fifteen 16 years old. 17 Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class B felony. 18 § 6. The first undesignated paragraph of section 230.33 of the penal 19 law, as amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read 20 as follows: 21 A person is guilty of compelling prostitution when, being eighteen 22 years old or more, [he or she] such person knowingly advances prostitu- 23 tion by compelling a person less than eighteen years old to engage in 24 prostitution, whether by force [or], intimidation, [to engage in prosti- 25 tution] deception, manipulation, coercion, abuse of a position of power 26 or authority, or abuse of the vulnerability or dependency of such person 27 less than eighteen years old. 28 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.